Maine, session 132, LD1595.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17 MRSA §2807, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 99, §1, is amended
to read:
A. "Commercial fishing activity" means an activity directly related to a commercial
fishing fisheries business as defined in Title 12, section 6001, subsection 6-A or a
commercial activity commonly associated with or supportive of commercial fishing or
aquaculture, such as the manufacture or sale of ice, bait, traps, cages or nets or the
manufacture, installation or repair of boats, engines or other equipment commonly used
on boats or in facilities that involve the catching, transporting, buying, selling or
processing of seafood for commercial purposes.
Sec. 2. 17 MRSA §2807, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 99, §1, is repealed.
Page 1 - 132LR2121(03)